Wyoming, session 2025, SF0091.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 36-1-116(a) and by creating a new
subsection (e) is amended to read:
36-1-116. Protection of prehistoric ruins; penalty.
(a) Except as provided by subsection subsections (d)
and (e) of this section, any person violating any of the
provisions of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and
shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00)
or more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or imprisoned
in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or by both
fine and imprisonment, and shall forfeit to the state all
articles and materials discovered by or through his
efforts.
(e) Any person who breaks, breaks off, cracks, carves
upon, writes, or otherwise marks upon or in any manner
destroys, mutilates, injures, defaces, removes, displaces,
mars or harms petroglyphs, pictographs or historic
inscriptions without consent of the state board of land
commissioners is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00),
imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.
Section 2. The department of state parks and cultural
resources may survey, document and create models,
internally or through a consultant, of all known
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0091
ENROLLED ACT NO. 91, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
petroglyphs and pictographs on state, school and
institutional land in Wyoming. No survey conducted pursuant
to this section shall access private lands without first
receiving permission from the landowner.
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2